Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:29.1.
(For contingent effective date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Stormwater Local Assistance Fund.

The State Comptroller shall continue in the state treasury the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund (the Fund) established by Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013, which shall be administered by the Department. All civil penalties and civil charges collected by the Board pursuant to §§

62.1-44.15:25

,

62.1-44.15

:48,

62.1-44.15:63

, and

62.1-44.15

:74, subdivision (19) of § 62.1-44.15, and §

62.1-44.19:22

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund, together with such other funds as may be made available to the Fund, which shall also receive bond proceeds from bonds authorized by the General Assembly, sums appropriated to it by the General Assembly, and other grants, gifts, and moneys as may be made available to it from any other source, public or private. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

The purpose of the Fund is to provide matching grants to local governments for the planning, design, and implementation of stormwater best management practices that address cost efficiency and commitments related to reducing water quality pollutant loads. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to meet (i) obligations related to the Chesapeake Bay total maximum daily load (TMDL) requirements, (ii) requirements for local impaired stream TMDLs, (iii) water quality measures of the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Implementation Plan, and (iv) water quality requirements related to the permitting of small municipal separate storm sewer systems. The grants shall be used solely for stormwater capital projects, including (a) new stormwater best management practices, (b) stormwater best management practice retrofitting or maintenance, (c) stream restoration, (d) low-impact development projects, (e) buffer restoration, (f) pond retrofitting, and (g) wetlands restoration. Such grants shall be made in accordance with eligibility determinations made by the Department pursuant to criteria established by the Board. Grants awarded for projects related to Chesapeake Bay TMDL requirements may take into account total phosphorus reductions or total nitrogen reductions. Grants awarded for eligible projects in localities with high or above average fiscal stress as reported by the Commission on Local Government may account for more than 50 percent of the costs of a project.

Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose set forth herein and disbursements from it shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

2016, cc. 68, 758; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 385.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 385, effective July 1, 2021, added the last two sentences of subsection B.

§ 62.1-44.15:29.2.
Stormwater Local Assistance Fund, estimate of requests.

The Department, in consultation with stakeholders, including representatives of the Virginia Municipal Stormwater Association, local governments, and conservation organizations, shall annually determine an estimate of the amount of stormwater local assistance matching grants expected to be requested by local governments for projects that are related to planning, designing, and implementing stormwater best management practices and are eligible for funding. The Department shall include such estimate in (i) the biennial funding report that is submitted to the Governor pursuant to the provisions of §

2.2-1504

and (ii) the annual progress report on the impaired waters clean-up plan that is submitted to legislative committees pursuant to the provisions of §

62.1-44.118

.

History.

2019, c. 533.

§ 62.1-44.15:30.
(For expiration date — see notes) Education and training programs.

The Board shall issue certificates of competence concerning the content and application of specified subject areas of this article and accompanying regulations, including program administration, plan review, and project inspection, to personnel of VSMP authorities and to any other persons who have completed training programs or in other ways demonstrated adequate knowledge to the satisfaction of the Board. As part of education and training programs authorized pursuant to subsection E of §

62.1-44.15:52

, the Department shall develop or certify expanded components to address program administration, plan review, and project inspection elements of this article and attendant regulations. Reasonable fees to cover the costs of these additional components may be charged.

Effective July 1, 2014, personnel of VSMP authorities reviewing plans or conducting inspections pursuant to this chapter shall hold a certificate of competence as provided in subsection A. Professionals registered in the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 1 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 54.1 shall be deemed to have met the provisions of this section for the purposes of renewals.

History.

2012, cc. 785, 819, § 10.1-603.4:2; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:30

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

§ 62.1-44.15:30.
(For effective date — see notes) Training and certification.

The Board shall issue separate or combined certifications concerning specified subject areas of this article, including program administration, plan review, and project inspection, to persons who have demonstrated adequate knowledge to the satisfaction of the Board. The Board also shall issue a Responsible Land Disturber certificate to personnel and contractors who have demonstrated adequate knowledge to the satisfaction of the Board.

The Department shall administer education and training programs for specified subject areas of this article and is authorized to charge persons attending such programs reasonable fees to cover the costs of administering the programs.

Personnel of VSMP or VESMP authorities who are administering programs, reviewing plans, or conducting inspections pursuant to this article shall hold a certification in the appropriate subject area as provided in subsection A. This requirement shall not apply to third-party individuals who prepare and submit plans to a VESMP or VSMP authority.

The Department shall establish procedures and requirements for issuance and periodic renewal of certifications.

Professionals registered in the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 1 (§

54.1-400

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 54.1 shall be deemed to have met the provisions of this section for the purposes of renewals of such certifications.

History.

2012, cc. 785, 819, § 10.1-603.4:2; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:30

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:31.
(For expiration date — see notes) Annual standards and specifications for state agencies, federal entities, and other specified entities.

State entities, including the Department of Transportation, and for linear projects set out in subsection B, electric, natural gas, and telephone utility companies, interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies, and railroad companies shall, and federal entities and authorities created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

may, annually submit a single set of standards and specifications for Department approval that describes how land-disturbing activities shall be conducted. Such standards and specifications shall be consistent with the requirements of this article and associated regulations, including the regulations governing the General Virginia Stormwater Management Program (VSMP) Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities and the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and associated regulations. Each project constructed in accordance with the requirements of this article, its attendant regulations, and where required standards and specifications shall obtain coverage issued under the state general permit prior to land disturbance. The standards and specifications shall include:

Technical criteria to meet the requirements of this article and regulations developed under this article;

Provisions for the long-term responsibility and maintenance of stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quantity and quality of runoff;

Provisions for erosion and sediment control and stormwater management program administration, plan design, review and approval, and construction inspection and enforcement;

Provisions for ensuring that responsible personnel and contractors obtain certifications or qualifications for erosion and sediment control and stormwater management comparable to those required for local government;

Implementation of a project tracking and notification system to the Department of all land-disturbing activities covered under this article; and

Requirements for documenting onsite changes as they occur to ensure compliance with the requirements of the article.

Linear projects subject to annual standards and specifications include:

Construction, installation, or maintenance of electric transmission, natural gas, and telephone utility lines and pipelines, and water and sewer lines; and

Construction of the tracks, rights-of-way, bridges, communication facilities, and other related structures and facilities of a railroad company.Linear projects not included in subdivisions 1 and 2 shall comply with the requirements of the local or state VSMP in the locality within which the project is located.

The Department shall perform random site inspections or inspections in response to a complaint to assure compliance with this article, the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), and regulations adopted thereunder. The Department may take enforcement actions in accordance with this article and related regulations.

The Department shall assess an administrative charge to cover the costs of services rendered associated with its responsibilities pursuant to this section.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.5; 2004, c. 372; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:31

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 627 inserted “(i)” and “or (ii) a stream restoration project for purposes of reducing nutrients or sediment entering state waters” in subsection C.

§ 62.1-44.15:31.
(For effective date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Standards and specifications for state agencies, federal entities, and other specified entities.

As an alternative to submitting soil erosion control and stormwater management plans for its land-disturbing activities pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:34

, the Virginia Department of Transportation shall, and any other state agency or federal entity may, submit standards and specifications for its conduct of land-disturbing activities for Department of Environmental Quality approval. Approved standards and specifications shall be consistent with this article. The Department of Environmental Quality shall have 60 days after receipt in which to act on any standards and specifications submitted or resubmitted to it for approval.

As an alternative to submitting soil erosion control and stormwater management plans pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:34

, electric, natural gas, and telephone utility companies, interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies, railroad companies, and authorities created pursuant to §

15.2-5102

may submit standards and specifications for Department approval that describe how land-disturbing activities shall be conducted. Such standards and specifications may be submitted for the following types of projects:

Construction, installation, or maintenance of electric transmission and distribution lines, oil or gas transmission and distribution pipelines, communication utility lines, and water and sewer lines; and

Construction of the tracks, rights-of-way, bridges, communication facilities, and other related structures and facilities of a railroad company.The Department shall have 60 days after receipt in which to act on any standards and specifications submitted or resubmitted to it for approval. A linear project not included in subdivision 1 or 2, or for which the owner chooses not to submit standards and specifications, shall comply with the requirements of the VESMP or the VESCP and VSMP, as appropriate, in any locality within which the project is located.

As an alternative to submitting soil erosion control and stormwater management plans pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:34

, any person engaging in more than one jurisdiction in the creation and operation of a wetland mitigation or stream restoration bank that has been approved and is operated in accordance with applicable federal and state guidance, laws, or regulations for the establishment, use, and operation of (i) a wetlands mitigation or stream restoration bank, pursuant to a mitigation banking instrument signed by the Department, the Marine Resources Commission, or the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, or (ii) a stream restoration project for purposes of reducing nutrients or sediment entering state waters may submit standards and specifications for Department approval that describe how land-disturbing activities shall be conducted. The Department shall have 60 days after receipt in which to act on standards and specifications submitted to it or resubmitted to it for approval.

All standards and specifications submitted to the Department shall be periodically updated according to a schedule to be established by the Department and shall be consistent with the requirements of this article. Approval of standards and specifications by the Department does not relieve the owner or operator of the duty to comply with any other applicable local ordinances or regulations. Standards and specifications shall include:

Technical criteria to meet the requirements of this article and regulations developed under this article;

Provisions for the long-term responsibility and maintenance of any stormwater management control devices and other techniques specified to manage the quantity and quality of runoff;

Provisions for administration of the standards and specifications program, project-specific plan design, plan review and plan approval, and construction inspection and compliance;

Provisions for ensuring that personnel and contractors assisting the owner in carrying out the land-disturbing activity obtain training or qualifications for soil erosion control and stormwater management as set forth in regulations adopted pursuant to this article;

Provisions for ensuring that personnel implementing approved standards and specifications pursuant to this section obtain certifications or qualifications comparable to those required for VESMP personnel pursuant to subsection C of §

62.1-44.15:30

;

Implementation of a project tracking system that ensures notification to the Department of all land-disturbing activities covered under this article; and

Requirements for documenting onsite changes as they occur to ensure compliance with the requirements of this article.

The Department shall perform random site inspections or inspections in response to a complaint to ensure compliance with this article and regulations adopted thereunder.

The Department shall assess an administrative charge to cover the costs of services rendered associated with its responsibilities pursuant to this section, including standards and specifications review and approval, project inspections, and compliance. The Board may take enforcement actions in accordance with this article and related regulations.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.5; 2004, c. 372; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2018, c. 627.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:31

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and rewrote the section. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:32.
(For repeal date — see notes) Duties of the Department.

The Department shall provide technical assistance, training, research, and coordination in stormwater management technology to VSMP authorities consistent with the purposes of this article.

The Department is authorized to review the stormwater management plan for any project with real or potential interjurisdictional impacts upon the request of one or all of the involved localities to determine that the plan is consistent with the provisions of this article. Any such review shall be completed and a report submitted to each locality involved within 90 days of such request being accepted. The Department may charge a fee of the requesting locality to cover its costs for providing such services.

The Department shall be responsible for the implementation of this article.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.6; 2004, c. 372; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:33.
(For expiration date — see notes) Authorization for more stringent ordinances.

Localities that are VSMP authorities are authorized to adopt more stringent stormwater management ordinances than those necessary to ensure compliance with the Board’s minimum regulations, provided that the more stringent ordinances are based upon factual findings of local or regional comprehensive watershed management studies or findings developed through the implementation of a MS4 permit or a locally adopted watershed management study and are determined by the locality to be necessary to prevent any further degradation to water resources, to address TMDL requirements, to protect exceptional state waters, or to address specific existing water pollution including nutrient and sediment loadings, stream channel erosion, depleted groundwater resources, or excessive localized flooding within the watershed and that prior to adopting more stringent ordinances a public hearing is held after giving due notice.

Localities that are VSMP authorities shall submit a letter report to the Department when more stringent stormwater management ordinances or more stringent requirements authorized by such ordinances, such as may be set forth in design manuals, policies, or guidance documents developed by the localities, are determined to be necessary pursuant to this section within 30 days after adoption thereof. Any such letter report shall include a summary explanation as to why the more stringent ordinance or requirement has been determined to be necessary pursuant to this section. Upon the request of an affected landowner or his agent submitted to the Department with a copy to be sent to the locality, within 90 days after adoption of any such ordinance or derivative requirement, localities shall submit the ordinance or requirement and all other supporting materials to the Department for a determination of whether the requirements of this section have been met and whether any determination made by the locality pursuant to this section is supported by the evidence. The Department shall issue a written determination setting forth its rationale within 90 days of submission. Such a determination, or a failure by the Department to make such a determination within the 90-day period, may be appealed to the Board.

Localities shall not prohibit or otherwise limit the use of any best management practice (BMP) approved for use by the Director or the Board except as follows:

When the Director or the Board approves the use of any BMP in accordance with its stated conditions, the locality serving as a VSMP authority shall have authority to preclude the onsite use of the approved BMP, or to require more stringent conditions upon its use, for a specific land-disturbing project based on a review of the stormwater management plan and project site conditions. Such limitations shall be based on site-specific concerns. Any project or site-specific determination purportedly authorized pursuant to this subsection may be appealed to the Department and the Department shall issue a written determination regarding compliance with this section to the requesting party within 90 days of submission. Any such determination, or a failure by the Department to make any such determination within the 90-day period, may be appealed to the Board.

When a locality is seeking to uniformly preclude jurisdiction-wide or otherwise limit geographically the use of a BMP approved by the Director or Board, or to apply more stringent conditions to the use of a BMP approved by the Director or Board, upon the request of an affected landowner or his agent submitted to the Department, with a copy submitted to the locality, within 90 days after adoption, such authorizing ordinances, design manuals, policies, or guidance documents developed by the locality that set forth the BMP use policy shall be provided to the Department in such manner as may be prescribed by the Department that includes a written justification and explanation as to why such more stringent limitation or conditions are determined to be necessary. The Department shall review all supporting materials provided by the locality to determine whether the requirements of this section have been met and that any determination made by the locality pursuant to this section is reasonable under the circumstances. The Department shall issue its determination to the locality in writing within 90 days of submission. Such a determination, or a failure by the Department to make such a determination within the 90-day period, may be appealed to the Board.

Based on a determination made in accordance with subsection B or C, any ordinance or other requirement enacted or established by a locality that is found to not comply with this section shall be null and void, replaced with state minimum standards, and remanded to the locality for revision to ensure compliance with this section. Any such ordinance or other requirement that has been proposed but neither enacted nor established shall be remanded to the locality for revision to ensure compliance with this section.

Any provisions of a local stormwater management program in existence before January 1, 2013, that contains more stringent provisions than this article shall be exempt from the requirements of this section. However, such provisions shall be reported to the Board at the time of the locality’s VSMP approval package.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.7; 1991, c. 84; 2004, c. 372; 2011, cc. 341, 353; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 591, 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:33

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, c. 591 amended
§ 10.1-603.7, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, Acts
2013, c. 591 has been given effect in this section as set out above by inserting the subsection B designation and substituting subsections B through D for the last sentence in former subsection A which read “Localities shall report to the Board when more stringent stormwater management ordinances are determined to be necessary pursuant to this section”; renumbered former subsection B as subsection E and substituted “2013” for “2005” and “this section” for “subsection A” in the first sentence and “at the time of” for “as part of” in the second sentence.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 2 provides: “That amendments to regulations of the State Water Control Board necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.), provided that there is a public comment period of at least 30 days on the proposed amendments prior to Board adoption.”

Acts
2014, cc. 303 and
598, cl. 3 provides: “That the consolidation into Virginia’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities of state post-construction requirements exceeding minimum federal requirements shall not be construed to modify the scope of federal agency or citizen suit enforcement pursuant to the Clean Water Act ( 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 303, effective March 24, 2014, and c. 598, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and in subsections A and B inserted “that are VSMP authorities” following “Localities” at the beginning.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Stormwater fee. —

The stormwater fee set forth in a city code to recoup costs associated with the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit program is a service fee rather than a tax, and the United States Navy is not constitutionally exempt from paying the fee. See opinion of Attorney General to Ronald S. Hallman, Esq., Chesapeake City Attorney, 09-098, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (3/4/10).

Restrictions on use of fertilizer. —

Virginia locality is authorized by § 10.1-603.7 and §

15.2-924.1

to adopt an ordinance regulating or prohibiting the use or application of fertilizers within its jurisdictional boundaries provided the locality makes the factual findings required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7 and determines that the ordinance is necessary to prevent any further degradation to water resources or to address specific existing water pollution. The locality also must comply with the public hearing procedures required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7. See opinion of Attorney General to James E. Barnett, Esq., York County Attorney, 09-035, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/1/09).